Washington statutes.
RCW 18.76.041

Consulting with other poison programs.

The department shall establish a system for consulting with other state and local agency programs concerned with poisons and poisonings, incidents involving exposures to potentially poisonous substances, and other toxicological matters to develop the most coordinated and consistent response to such situations as is reasonably possible.

[ 1993 c 343 s 3.]